nursery/apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/sho:v.oämemaleb__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elsho:oämemalob</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elsho:oämemalob</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylsho:oämémaloob</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylsho:oämémaloob</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleyb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleyb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleyb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleyb</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleib</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sho:v.oämemaleib</l> 
        <r>sho:v.oämemaleb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="/s:òamemacea__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemu-momawooc</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemu-momawooc</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:òamémufehowooc</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:òamémufehowooc</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacea</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:òamemacia</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:òamemacia</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacya</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacya</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>els:òamemacya</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>els:òamemacya</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacia</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:òamemacia</l> 
        <r>s:òamemacea<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="s:òamemacea"><par n="/s:òamemacea__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sho:v.oämemaleb"><par n="/sho:v.oämemaleb__vblex"/></e>
